California, session 20252026, AB2090.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2628 of the Probate Code is amended to read:2628. (a) The court may make an order that the guardian or conservator need not present the accounts otherwise required by this chapter so long as all of the following conditions are satisfied:(1) The estate at the beginning and end of the accounting period for which an account is otherwise required consisted of property, exclusive of the residence of the ward or conservatee, of a total net value of less than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).(2) The income of the estate for each month of the accounting period, exclusive of public benefit payments, was less than three thousand two hundred dollars ($3,200).(3) All income of the estate during the accounting period, if not retained, was spent for the benefit of the ward or conservatee.(b) Notwithstanding that the court has made an order under subdivision (a), the ward or conservatee or any interested person may petition the court for an order requiring the guardian or conservator to present an account as otherwise required by this chapter or the court on its own motion may make that an order. An order under this subdivision may be made ex parte or on such notice of hearing as the court in its discretion requires.(c) For any accounting period during which all of the conditions of subdivision (a) are not satisfied, the guardian or conservator shall present the account as otherwise required by this chapter.